nds_de.aff
# N anfügen, z.B. Adjektiv good => gode
SFX N Y 96
SFX N 0   en     [^aeiouöü][^aeiouöü]
SFX N 0   en     [^aeiouöü]er
SFX N 0   n      e
SFX N 0   en     [i][^aeiouöü]
SFX N bel blen   bel
SFX N aab aben   aab
SFX N aad aden   aad
SFX N aag agen   aag
SFX N aak aken   aak
SFX N aal alen   aal
SFX N aam amen   aam
SFX N aan anen   aan
SFX N aap apen   aap
SFX N aar aren   aar
SFX N aas asen   aas
SFX N aat aten   aat
SFX N aav aven   aav
SFX N aaw awen   aaw
SFX N eeb eben   eeb
SFX N eed eden   eed
SFX N eeg egen   eeg
SFX N eek eken   eek
SFX N eel elen   eel
SFX N eem emen   eem
SFX N een enen   een
SFX N eep epen   eep
SFX N eer eren   eer
SFX N ees esen   ees
SFX N eet eten   eet
SFX N eev even   eev
SFX N eew ewen   eew
SFX N oob oben   oob
SFX N ood oden   ood
SFX N oog ogen   oog
SFX N ook oken   ook
SFX N ool olen   ool
SFX N oom omen   oom
SFX N oon onen   oon
SFX N oop open   oop
SFX N oor oren   oor
SFX N oos osen   oos
SFX N oot oten   oot
SFX N oov oven   oov
SFX N oow owen   oow
SFX N uub uben   uub
SFX N uud uden   uud
SFX N uug ugen   uug
SFX N uuk uken   uuk
SFX N uul ulen   uul
SFX N uum umen   uum
SFX N uun unen   uun
SFX N uup upen   uup
SFX N uur uren   uur
SFX N uus usen   uus
SFX N uut uten   uut
SFX N uuv uven   uuv
SFX N uuw uwen   uuw
SFX N ääb äben   ääb
SFX N ääd äden   ääd
SFX N ääg ägen   ääg
SFX N ääk äken   ääk
SFX N ääl älen   ääl
SFX N ääm ämen   ääm
SFX N ään änen   ään
SFX N ääp äpen   ääp
SFX N äär ären   äär
SFX N ääs äsen   ääs
SFX N äät äten   äät
SFX N ääv även   ääv
SFX N ääw äwen   ääw
SFX N ööb öben   ööb
SFX N ööd öden   ööd
SFX N öög ögen   öög
SFX N öök öken   öök
SFX N ööl ölen   ööl
SFX N ööm ömen   ööm
SFX N öön önen   öön
SFX N ööp öpen   ööp
SFX N öör ören   öör
SFX N öös ösen   öös
SFX N ööt öten   ööt
SFX N ööv öven   ööv
SFX N ööw öwen   ööw
SFX N üüb üben   üüb
SFX N üüd üden   üüd
SFX N üüg ügen   üüg
SFX N üük üken   üük
SFX N üül ülen   üül
SFX N üüm ümen   üüm
SFX N üün ünen   üün
SFX N üüp üpen   üüp
SFX N üür üren   üür
SFX N üüs üsen   üüs
SFX N üüt üten   üüt
SFX N üüv üven   üüv
SFX N üüw üwen   üüw

# Angehängtes S zur Pluralbildung.
# Führt nie zu Doppelvokalvereinzelung
SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 s
