nds_de.dic
Aap/N
Aapkatt/N
abstrakt/EN
Achtergrundperzess/N
Achtergrundprogramm/N
Adjektiv/N
Adress/N
Adresstyp/N
Adresslist/N
adrett/EN
Afdeel/N
Affalltünn/N
afgünstig/EN
afhangig/EN
Aflaag/N
Afreken/N
Afsenner/S
afsluut/EN
Afsluutweert/N
Afsnitt/N
Afspeellist/N
Afspeler/S
akadeemsch/EN
Akademie/N
akraat/EN
akrater/EN
akraatst/EN
Akraatheit/N
Akschoon/N
Aktivität/N
aktuell/EN
akustisch/EN
Akzent/N
algoritmisch/EN
Alkalimetall/N
allgemeen/EN
alphanumeersch/EN
alternativ/EN
Amööb/N
Amplituud/N
Anbeder/S
Andacht/N
Andeel/N
andockbor/EN
Anemoon/N
Anfänger/S
Anfraag/N
Angaav/N
bedden/IDWMOJPNUÜ
böög/DWMOQRSEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
boog/DQRSEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
drogen/AQBJPTSEUVFX
drömen/HNUV
drööm/DWMOHNUV
droppen/IDWMOQRNGX
drücken/IDWMOQBRJPTSEUVX
drüppeln/IDWMOQBREPNKGTUVX
faten/ABRJPNTVÜ
faat/DABRJPNTVÜ
flüggst/AQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
flüggt/AQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
flöög/DAQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
flögen/AQRSEJPTUVFXÜ
föhren/IDWMOAQRJPSEUVFX
freten/QARJPNGTUVX
freet/DQARJPNGTUVX
geihst/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
geiht/AQBRJHPNGTSEUVFXÜ
gaht/AQBRJHPNGSTEUVFXÜ
geven/ABQRJPGTSEUVFX
giffst/ABQRJPGTSEUVFX
geevt/ABQRJPGTSEUVFX
groov/DQRJPNGUVFÜ
groven/QRJPNGUVFÜ
grippst/AQBRJPTSUVFX
grepen/AQBRJPTSUVFX
halen/QVUSPJHNKG
heven/ARPNKGUVX
hollen/AQBRJPTSEUVF
höllst/AQBRJPTSEUVF
höllt/AQBRJPTSEUVF
helen/AQBRJPTSEUVF
höör/DWMOAFJPTSEVX
kaam/WABRHPNKGSEUVFX
keem/DABRHPNKGSEUVFX
kemen/ABRHPNKGSEUVFX
kieken/IDWAQBRJHTSEUVX
keek/DAQBRJHTSEUVX
keken/AQBRJHTSEUVX
klattern/IDWMOBRHNKGTFX
koperen/SE
kopeer/DWMOSE
kriegen/IWQJPNKGEX
kriggst/QJPNKGEX
kreeg/DQJNKPGEX
ledden/IDWMOAQRSJTUVÜ
leggen/IDWMOAQBJPTSEUVFX
leden/AQBJPTSEUVFX
linken/IDWMOSEJV
locken/IDWMOARSENKGVX
lopen/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
loop/WAQBRJPTSEUVFX
löppst/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
löppt/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
leep/DAQBRJPTSEUVFX
lepen/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
luustern/IDWBRHN
malen/QABHPNKUVFXÜ
nehmen/IWAQJPTSEUVFX
nimm/DWAQJPTSEUVFX
packen/IDWMOAQBSEJPNKGTUVFXÜ
parken/IDWMOQEJNKGTUXÜ
pingeln/IDWMOARSGF
proppen/IDWMOABRHNGTVF
quälen/QRSENKG
reisen/IDWMOAQBRSEJTUVFX
richten/IDWMOAFBJPTSEUV
riddst/ARSEJHNKGTUFXÜ
riddt/ARSEJHNKGTUFXÜ
reed/DARSEJHNKGTUFXÜ
schapen/ABSENKGX
schicken/IDWMOABQRJTSEVFX
schieten/IQABNKGTUVX
schitt/DQABNKGTUVX
scheet/DQABNKGTUVX
schrieven/IWAQBRJPNTEUVFÜ
schrifft/AQBRJPNTEUVFÜ
schutern/IDWMOSEJHTUXÜ
schuven/AQRJPNKGTSEVFX
schuffst/AQRJPNKGTSEVFX
schoven/AQRJPNKGTSEVFX
schaven/AQRJPNKGTSEVFX
sehn/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
seh/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
sühst/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
süht/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
seeg/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
segen/AQBRJPTSEUVFX
sennen/IDQJTSEUVX
sendt/QJTSEUVX
sendte/QJTSEUVX
sendten/QJTSEUVX
smeren/ABJHPNKTUVFX
smieten/IAQBJGTSEX
smittst/AQBJGTSEX
smeet/DAQBJGTSEX
smeten/AQBJGTSEX
smölten/IDWMOQRJPNGUVXÜ
spiggt/ABREHNKGUX
speeg/DABREHNKGUX
spölen/QARSEHGUFX
spööl/DWMOQARSEHGUFX
spören/RHPNUF
spöör/DWMORHPNUF
spreek/WQABRNRGUVF
sprickst/QABRNRGUVF
sprickt/QABRNRGUVF
sproken/QABRNRGUVF
spraken/MOQABRNRGUVF
spröhen/IDWMOABREJHPNKGTUV
sprütten/IDWMOQABEJHPNKGTVFXÜ
stellen/IDWMOAQBRSJPTEUVFXÜ
stöten/AQRSEPTUVX
stött/DAQRSEPTUVX
stüern/IDWMOARSEUVX
süggst/QARJPNKGUX
soog/DQARJPNKGUX
sweven/AQRSEJFXÜ
tarren/IDWMORSEVFX
tasten/IDWMOQBNKGF
tövern/IDWMOBSVX
wussen/IDABRSEJPTUV
weven/OJNV
weev/DWMOJNV
abchaassch/EN
afaarsch/EN
afrikaansch/EN
albaansch/EN
amerikaansch/EN
antarktsch/EN
araabsch/EN
argentiensch/EN
armeensch/EN
aserbaidschaansch/EN
assameesch/EN
austraalsch/EN
baltsch/EN
baschkiirsch/EN
basksch/EN
belgsch/EN
bengaalsch/EN
bosnisch/EN
brasiliaansch/EN
bretoonsch/EN
burmeesch/EN
däänsch/EN
düütsch/EN
engelsch/EN
estnsch/EN
europääsch/EN
färöösch/EN
finnsch/EN
franzöösch/EN
freesch/EN
galizsch/EN
georgsch/EN
greeksch/EN
hebrääsch/EN
indisch/EN
iraansch/EN
irsch/EN
islannsch/EN
italieensch/EN
japaansch/EN
javaneesch/EN
jemenietsch/EN
jiddsch/EN
jugoslaawsch/EN
kanaadsch/EN
katalaansch/EN
kasachsch/EN
kaschmiirsch/EN
kirgiisch/EN
koreaansch/EN
korssch/EN
kroaatsch/EN
kurdsch/EN
laootsch/EN
latienamerikaansch/EN
latiensch/EN
lettsch/EN
limborgsch/EN
litausch/EN
luxemborgsch/EN
makedoonsch/EN
malaiisch/EN
malteesch/EN
marschalleesch/EN
moldaawsch/EN
birmaanssch/EN
nedderlannsch/EN
nepaleesch/EN
norweegsch/EN
okzitaansch/EN
osseetsch/EN
palästinensch/EN
pandschaabsch/EN
paschtuunsch/EN
persisch/EN
poolsch/EN
polyneesch/EN
portugeesch/EN
provenzaalsch/EN
rumäänsch/EN
rätoromaansch/EN
saamsch/EN
samoaansch/EN
sardiensch/EN
schottsch/EN
serbsch/EN
serbokroaatsch/EN
singaleesch/EN
slaawsch/EN
slowaaksch/EN
sloweensch/EN
sorbsch/EN
spaansch/EN
sundaneesch/EN
sweedsch/EN
syrsch/EN
tadschiiksch/EN
tahiitsch/EN
tamielsch/EN
tartaarsch/EN
tibeetsch/EN
törksch/EN
thailannsch/EN
tschechsch/EN
tschetscheensch/EN
tschuwasch/EN
turkmeensch/EN
uighuursch/EN
ukrainsch/EN
ungaarsch/EN
vietnameesch/EN
waliessch/EN
walloonsch/EN
